Nevada, session 83, AB251.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 583 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
“Custom processing” means the slaughter, skinning and
preparation of livestock and poultry through humane means upon
request of the owner or person in lawful possession of the
livestock or poultry and for consumption by the owner or person,
including, without limitation, immediate family members and
nonpaying guests.
Sec. 1.3. NRS 583.255 is hereby amended to read as follows:
583.255 As used in NRS 583.255 to 583.555, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 583.265 to 583.429, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, have the meanings ascribed to them in those
sections.
Sec. 1.5. NRS 583.277 is hereby amended to read as follows:
583.277 “Custom processing establishment” means a [fixed]
facility that [slaughters or processes livestock or poultry for or upon
request by the owner or person in lawful possession of the livestock
or poultry] is licensed in accordance with the regulations adopted
by the Officer pursuant to NRS 583.454 to:
1. Perform custom processing at the facility; and
2. Slaughter for hire on a commercial basis any meat animal,
game mammal, poultry or game bird for human consumption at
the facility. [The term does not include an official establishment.]
Sec. 1.7. NRS 583.357 is hereby amended to read as follows:
583.357 “Mobile processing unit” means any truck, trailer, van
or other vehicle that is [used] licensed in accordance with the
regulations adopted by the Officer pursuant to NRS 583.454 to
[slaughter or process livestock or poultry for or upon request by the
owner or person in lawful possession of the livestock or poultry] :
1. Perform custom processing; and
2. Slaughter for hire on a commercial basis any meat animal,
game mammal, poultry or game bird for human consumption,
 at the owner’s or person’s farm or other facility or at a location
approved by the Officer. [The term does not include an official
establishment.]
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Sec. 2. NRS 583.375 is hereby amended to read as follows:
583.375 “Official establishment” means any establishment or
mobile processing unit in this [state,] State, other than an
establishment covered by subsection 1 of NRS 583.545, which on a
commercial basis slaughters for hire any meat animal, game
mammal, poultry or game bird for human consumption, and which
has been inspected and approved by the Officer.
Sec. 3. NRS 583.454 is hereby amended to read as follows:
583.454 1. The Officer shall adopt regulations providing a
process for a person to obtain a license to operate a custom
processing establishment or mobile processing unit in this State.
2. The regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) Must set forth, without limitation:
(1) The requirements for the issuance or renewal of the
license;
(2) The fees, if any, for the issuance or renewal of the
license;
(3) The requirements for operating the custom processing
establishment or mobile processing unit, including, without
limitation, standard operating procedures, sanitation, equipment,
conditions, reporting, recordkeeping, labeling and packaging;
(4) A requirement for an inspection of the custom processing
establishment or mobile processing unit to be conducted at least
annually and at such other times as deemed necessary by the
Department; and
(5) Any other requirements the Officer determines are
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section, including,
without limitation, the issuance of a stop sale order for a violation of
any provision of this chapter or regulations adopted pursuant to this
chapter; [and]
(b) Must authorize a mobile processing unit to perform custom
processing and operate as an official establishment for the
purposes of this section and NRS 583.255 to 583.555, inclusive,
and section 1 of this act;
(c) Must authorize a custom processing establishment and
mobile processing unit to slaughter for hire on a commercial basis
for intrastate sale any meat animal, game mammal, poultry or
game bird for human consumption; and
(d) Must be consistent with any regulations adopted by the
United States Department of Agriculture.
3. When a person is issued a license to operate a custom
processing facility [or mobile processing unit] pursuant to the
regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 1, the custom processing
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
facility [or mobile processing unit] for which the license is issued
shall be deemed to be an official establishment for the purposes of
this section and NRS 583.255 to 583.555, inclusive [.] , and section
1 of this act.
Sec. 4. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 3, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)